Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201257-1403
Legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) Nebraska
has the authority as a sovereign state to protect its land and natural resources
for economic and aesthetic purposes for the benefit of its residents and future
generations by regulation through approval or disapproval of major oil pipeline
siting and the location of routes, so long as it does not regulate in the
area of safety as to the design, installation, inspection, emergency plans
and procedures, testing, construction, extension, operation, replacement,
and maintenance of major oil pipelines and pipeline facilities;

(2) The water
and other natural resources in Nebraska will become increasingly valuable,
both economically and strategically, as the demand for agricultural products
for both food and fuel increases;

(3) The construction of major oil pipelines
in Nebraska is in the public interest of Nebraska and the nation to meet the
increasing need for energy; and

(4) The irrigation economy of Nebraska which
relies on quality water adds over one billion dollars annually to net farm
income and increases the gross state product by three billion dollars annually.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 4.